New York, session 2025-2026, S7155.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1-a of section 404 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 105 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 1-a. The commissioner may issue special number and/or distinctive 5 license plates to applicants who are members of veterans organizations 6 or active duty military members in the same manner as other number 7 plates are issued pursuant to this article. Such special number plates 8 or distinctive plates shall be issued only upon (a) payment of [a one- 9 time service charge of ten dollars in addition to] the regular registra- 10 tion fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, and (b) 11 submission of proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the appli- 12 cant is presently an active duty member or a member of the veterans 13 organization for which such plate is requested. No additional fees for 14 customization of such plates shall be required. Such membership shall be 15 verified annually by the applicant. Application for such plates shall be 16 made in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner with 17 respect to the issuance of such plates. Provided, however, that nothing 18 contained herein shall be deemed to supersede the provisions of section 19 four hundred four-d, four hundred four-e, four hundred four-h, four 20 hundred four-i, four hundred four-j, four hundred four-k, four hundred 21 four-p, four hundred four-aa, or four hundred four-dd of this article. 22 § 2. Subdivision 6 of section 401 of the vehicle and traffic law is 23 amended by adding a new paragraph c-1 to read as follows: 24 c-1. The provisions of this subdivision with respect to the payment of 25 registration renewal fees shall not apply to a motor vehicle registra- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04783-01-5 S. 7155 2 1 tion renewed by an active duty military member or a qualified veteran. A 2 qualified veteran is an individual who served on active duty in the 3 United States army, navy, air force, marine corps, coast guard or the 4 reserves thereof, or who served in active military service of the United 5 States as a member of the army national guard, air national guard, New 6 York guard or New York naval militia; who was released from active duty 7 by general or honorable discharge. 8 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 404-h of the vehicle and traffic law, as 9 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 12 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 13 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 14 provided, however, that [an additional one-time] no service charge [of 15 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 16 § 4. Subdivision 4 of section 404-j of the vehicle and traffic law, as 17 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 4. Fee. A special plate and registration issued pursuant to this 20 section shall be issued upon payment of the regular registration fee 21 prescribed by section four hundred one of this article provided, howev- 22 er, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge [of ten dollars] 23 shall be charged for such plate. 24 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 404-v of the vehicle and traffic law, as 25 amended by chapter 490 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 28 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 29 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, 30 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge [of 31 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. [Provided, however, that 32 one year after the effective date of this section funds in the amount of 33 five thousand dollars, or so much thereof as may be available, shall be 34 allocated from such funds to the department to offset costs associated 35 with the production of such license plates.] 36 § 6. Subdivision 3 of section 404-w of the vehicle and traffic law, as 37 added by chapter 105 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 38 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 39 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 40 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred of this article, 41 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge [of 42 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 43 § 7. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 404-w of the vehicle and traffic 44 law, as added by chapter 493 of the laws of 2005, are amended to read as 45 follows: 46 4. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 47 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 48 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 49 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one time] service charge [of 50 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 51 [5. Nothing contained herein shall require the issuance of a special 52 number plate under this section unless the commissioner is satisfied 53 that the aggregate amount of annual service charges collected pursuant 54 to subdivision four of this section will be sufficient to recover the 55 costs of the design and manufacture of such special plates.] S. 7155 3 1 § 8. Subdivision 3 of section 404-aa of the vehicle and traffic law, 2 as added by chapter 103 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 5 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 6 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article; 7 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge 8 [of ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 9 § 9. Subdivision 3 of section 404-d of the vehicle and traffic law, as 10 amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 13 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 14 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 15 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge [of 16 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 17 § 10. Subdivision 3 of section 404-k of the vehicle and traffic law, 18 as amended by chapter 415 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 21 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 22 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 23 provided, however, that [an] no additional [one-time] service charge [of 24 ten dollars] shall be charged for such plate. 25 § 11. Subdivision 3 of section 404-i of the vehicle and traffic law, 26 as amended by chapter 486 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 29 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 30 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article, 31 provided, however, that no service charge or renewal fees shall be 32 charged for such plate. 33 § 12. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 34 have become a law.